Idaho, session 2026, S1411.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-1807, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1807. CIRCULATION OF PETITIONS -- PAID SIGNATURE GATHERERS --
VERIFICATION OF PETITION AND SIGNATURE SHEETS -- CERTIFICATION OF PETITION
SIGNERS -- CERTAIN PETITIONS AND SIGNATURES VOID. (1) Any person who cir-
culates any petition for an initiative or referendum shall be a resident
qualified elector of the state of Idaho and at least eighteen (18) years of
age and shall comply with all provisions of section 67-6628B, Idaho Code, in
the course of circulating any such petition.
(2)(a) Any person who accepts payment to circulate a petition for an
initiative or referendum shall, prior to accepting a signature:
(i) Verbally notify any potential signatory that such person is
accepting payment to gather signatures and provide the name of the
person or entity providing payment to such person; and
(ii) Cause to be printed on each page of any petition for an ini-
tiative or referendum a prominent and legible declaration that
such person is receiving payment in exchange for circulating the
petition and the name of the person providing payment to such per-
son.
(b) At all times a person is circulating a petition pursuant to para-
graph (a) of this subsection, such person shall wear a badge that is
clearly visible to any potential signatory and that contains the words
"paid petition circulator" on it .
(c) The Idaho secretary of state shall promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this subsection, which shall provide details re-
garding the font specifications that shall be required for the printed
declaration required under paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection and the
specifications regarding font, shape, color, and size requirements for
the badge required under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3) (2) Each and every sheet of every such petition for an initiative
or referendum containing signatures shall be verified on the face thereof in


substantially the following form, by the person who circulated said sheet of
said petition, by his or her affidavit thereon, and as a part thereof:
(a) For persons not accepting payment for circulating a petition:
State of Idaho )
)ss.
County of.... )
I,...., being first duly sworn, say that I am a resident qualified elec-
tor of the State of Idaho and at least eighteen (18) years of age; that I have
not and will not accept remuneration in any way related to the petition; that
every person who signed this sheet of the foregoing petition signed his or
her name thereto in my presence; that I believe that each has stated his or
her name, address and residence correctly; and that each signer is a quali-
fied elector of the State of Idaho and a resident of the county of.....
Signed.................................
Post office address.....................
Subscribed and sworn to before me this.... day of.....
(Notary Seal) Notary Public ..........................
Residing at ............................
(b) For persons accepting payment for circulating a petition:
State of Idaho )
)ss.
County of.... )
I,...., being first duly sworn, say that I am a resident qualified elec-
tor of the state State of Idaho and at least eighteen (18) years of age; that
every person who signed this sheet of the foregoing petition signed his or
her name thereto in my presence, after I verbally notified each individual
signer that I will receive payment in exchange for gathering the signatures
on this sheet; that I believe that each has stated his or her name, address
and residence correctly; and that each signer is a qualified elector of the
State of Idaho and a resident of the county of.....
I am accepting payment for the circulation of the foregoing petition
by.... and the address of such payor is.....
Signed.................................
Post office address.....................
Subscribed and sworn to before me this.... day of.....
(Notary Seal) Notary Public ..........................
Residing at ............................
(4) (3) In addition to said affidavit, the county clerk shall carefully
examine said petitions and strike from the petition any names for which he
has determined that the name, address, or signature do not match and confirm
that each name, address, and signature matches those of a qualified elector
of the proper jurisdiction and that the petitions conform to all other provi-
sions of this section. The county clerk shall attach to the signature sheets
a certificate to the secretary of state substantially as follows:


State of Idaho )
)ss.
County of.... )
To the Honorable...., Secretary of State for the State of Idaho:
I,...., County Clerk of.... County, hereby certify that.... signatures on
this petition are those of qualified electors in Legislative District Num-
ber.....
Signed.................................
County Clerk or Deputy.
(Seal of office)
(5) (4) The county clerk shall deliver the petition or any part thereof
to the person from whom he received it with his certificate attached thereto
as above provided. The forms herein given are not mandatory and if substan-
tially followed in any petition, it shall be sufficient, disregarding cleri-
cal and merely technical error.
(6) (5) Any petition on which signatures are obtained by a person not a
resident qualified elector of the state of Idaho and at least eighteen (18)
years of age shall be void. The definition of resident qualified elector in
section 34-107 34-104, Idaho Code, shall apply to the circulators of initia-
tive and referendum petitions.
(7) (6) Any signature that is not a physical signature, including an
electronic signature, is void.
(8) (7) Any petition for an initiative or referendum on which signa-
tures are obtained that is circulated in violation of the disclosure provi-
sions provided in subsection (2) of this section 67-6628B, Idaho Code, is
void.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 66, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6628B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6628B. PAID IN-PERSON CANVASSING ACTIVITIES -- DISCLOSURES. (1)
For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Paid in-person canvassing activities" means canvassing activi-
ties performed by an individual who accepts financial compensation for
the purpose of influencing how a person votes, including but not limited
to circulating any petition for an initiative or referendum; soliciting
personal residences or public locations to communicate with or distrib-
ute materials to possible voters about political candidates or ballot
measures; conducting in-person get-out-the-vote efforts in relation to
any candidate or ballot measure; and any other direct, in-person con-
tact or interaction intended to affect an individual's electoral par-
ticipation or preferences.
(b) "Phone banking activities" means any organized outreach activity
in which telephone calls are made to Idaho qualified electors for the
purpose of persuading such electors to vote or to vote in a particular
manner, providing information to such electors regarding an election or
voting, or mobilizing such electors to vote.
(2) Persons who engage in any paid in-person canvassing activities
shall:


(a) Meet all of the qualifications of a qualified elector, as defined
in section 34-104, Idaho Code, except that a person under eighteen (18)
years of age shall only be required to have resided in this state for at
least thirty (30) days;
(b) Verbally notify any person with whom they communicate that they are
being compensated to perform paid in-person canvassing activities and
provide the name of the persons or entities providing payment to such
person; and
(c) At all times, while engaging in paid in-person canvassing activi-
ties, wear a badge that is clearly visible to any person with whom they
intend to communicate with that contains the words "paid political ad-
vocate" as well as the name of the persons or entities providing payment
to such person.
(3) The Idaho secretary of state may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section, including specifications regarding font, shape,
color, and size requirements for the badge required pursuant to subsection
(2)(c) of this section.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Volunteers acting without compensation or reimbursement beyond in-
cidental expenses;
(b) Individuals whose paid in-person canvassing activities are inci-
dental to broader campaign employment responsibilities;
(c) Phone banking activities; or
(d) Candidates engaged in in-person canvassing activities for their
own election campaign.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-6625, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6625. VIOLATIONS -- CIVIL FINE -- MISDEMEANOR PENALTY -- PROSECU-
TION -- LIMITATION -- VENUE. (1) Any person who violates the provisions of
sections 67-6603, 67-6604, 67-6606 through 67-6614A, 67-6624, 67-6627 or,
67-6628, or 67-6628B, Idaho Code, shall be liable for a civil fine not to ex-
ceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if an individual, and not more than two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) if a person other than an individual.
The burden of proof for such civil liability shall be met by showing a prepon-
derance of the evidence.
(2) Any person who violates section 67-6605, Idaho Code, and any per-
son who knowingly and willfully violates sections 67-6603 through 67-6614A,
67-6624, 67-6627 or, 67-6628, or 67-6628B, Idaho Code, is guilty of a misde-
meanor and, upon conviction, in addition to the fines set forth in subsection
(1) of this section, may be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or be
both fined and imprisoned.
(3) The attorney general or the appropriate prosecuting attorney may
prosecute any violations of this chapter.
(4) Prosecution for a civil or misdemeanor violation of this chapter
must be commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the violation
occurred. Prosecution for a felony violation of this chapter must be com-
menced pursuant to the provisions of section 19-402, Idaho Code.


(5) Venue for prosecution under the provisions of this chapter shall be
in the county of residence of the defendant if the defendant is a resident of
the state of Idaho, otherwise venue shall be in Ada county.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.